Montana, session 2025, SB378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Tribal relations management team. (1) There is a tribal relations
management team in the department of public health and human services that consists of a tribal relations
manager and a director of American Indian health.
(2) The tribal relations manager:
(a) serves as the lead communicator to tribal governments, the federal government, and other
tribal health partners in support of the department's government-to-government relationship;
(b) provides advice and guidance to assist in educating, informing, and supporting department
leaders as they integrate work with tribal communities and governments;
(c) provides guidance and assistance to department staff in the creation of policy and programs
that involve collaborative work with tribes;
(d) assists in organizing and facilitating formal tribal consultations, including requirements pursuant
to 2-15-141 through 2-15-143;
(e) coordinates and finalizes the annual tribal relations report to the governor required in 2-15-143;
and
(f) carries out other duties as determined by the department, except for those assigned to the
director of American Indian health pursuant to subsection (3).
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 378

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 378.1
(3) The director of American Indian health:
(a) identifies sources of disparities in health, lifespans, and other health outcomes that exist
between Indian and non-Indian populations in the state;
(b) develops strategies for improving health equity while providing a forum for addressing state-
tribal health issues; and
(c) carries out other duties as determined by the department, except for those assigned to the
tribal relations manager pursuant to subsection (2).
(4) The tribal relations manager and director of American Indian health may coordinate and
collaborate to carry out their duties, but the positions may not be held by the same individual.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 2, chapter 15, part 22, and the provisions of Title 2, chapter 15, part 22, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 378